Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-438
Annual, temporary, hangtag, disabled veteran, and active-duty military permits; fees.

(1) The commission shall devise annual, temporary, hangtag, disabled veteran, and active-duty military permits.

(2) The annual permit may be purchased by any person and shall be valid through December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued. The fee for the annual permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more than fifty dollars per permit. The fee for the annual permit for a nonresident motor vehicle shall be two times the fee for a resident motor vehicle. The commission shall establish such fees by the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations.

(3) A temporary permit may be purchased by any person and shall be valid until noon of the day following the date of issue. The fee for the temporary permit for a resident motor vehicle shall be not more than ten dollars. The fee for the temporary permit for a nonresident motor vehicle shall be two times the fee for a resident motor vehicle. The commission shall establish such fees by the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations. The commission may issue temporary permits which are either valid for any area or valid for a single area.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2027, an annual hangtag permit may be purchased by any person with a resident motor vehicle. The fee for the hangtag permit shall be the combined cost of one resident annual permit, one duplicate annual permit, and a convenience fee. The hangtag permit shall be valid through December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued and only for the vehicle in which it is displayed. A hangtag permit issued pursuant to this subsection may be transferred between motor vehicles registered by the permit holder in the State of Nebraska. A hangtag permit shall not be reproduced or replaced if lost or stolen. The commission shall establish a convenience fee for hangtag permits that does not exceed fifteen dollars.

(5)(a) A veteran who is a resident of Nebraska shall, upon application and without payment of any fee, be issued one disabled veteran permit for a resident motor vehicle if the veteran:

(i) Was discharged or separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions); and

(ii)(A) Is rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as fifty percent or more disabled as a result of service in the armed forces of the United States; or

(B) Is receiving a pension from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a result of total and permanent disability, which disability was not incurred in the line of duty in the military service.

(b) All disabled veteran permits issued pursuant to this subsection shall be perpetual and shall become void only upon termination of eligibility as provided in this subsection.

(6) An active-duty military permit may be purchased by any individual who is active-duty military and shall be valid through December 31 in the year for which the permit is issued. The fee for the active-duty military permit is five dollars, regardless of residency. To qualify for an active-duty military permit, the individual shall present:

(a) Such individual's military identification card; and

(b) Proof that such individual is stationed at a military base located in Nebraska for active-duty military service.

(7) The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits at temporarily reduced rates for specific events or during specified timeframes.

(8) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 742, § 7;

Laws 1980, LB 723, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 74, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 199, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1105;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 148;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 35;

Laws 2003, LB 122, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 14;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB421, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB770, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB336, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB867, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB36, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB1127, § 1.
July 18, 2026